Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 28 Rehabilitation and Liquidation
§ 26-28-127.
Allowance of certain claims after insolvency; entry of liquidation order.

No contingent and unliquidated claim shall share in a distribution of an insurer’s assets if that insurer is adjudicated to be insolvent by an order made pursuant to this chapter, except that the claim shall be considered, if properly presented, and may be allowed to share if:

The claim is absolute against the insurer on or before the last day for filing claims against the insurer’s assets; or

There is a surplus and the liquidation is thereafter conducted upon the basis that the insurer is solvent.

If an insurer is adjudicated to be insolvent, any person who has a cause of action against an insured of that insurer, under a liability insurance policy issued by the insurer, may file a claim in the liquidation proceeding, regardless of the fact that the claim is contingent, and the claim may be allowed if:

It may be reasonably inferred from the proof presented upon the claim that the person would be able to obtain a judgment upon the cause of action against the insured;

The person furnishes suitable proof, unless the court for good cause shown otherwise directs, that no further valid claim against the insurer arising out of his cause of action other than those already presented can be made; and

The insurer’s total liability to all claimants arising out of the same act of its insured is no greater than its maximum liability would be were it not in liquidation.

No judgment against an insured taken after the date of entry of the liquidation order shall be considered in the liquidation proceedings as evidence of liability, or of the amount of damages. No judgment against an insured taken by default or by collusion prior to the entry of the liquidation order shall be considered as conclusive evidence in the liquidation proceedings, either of the liability of the insured to the person upon the cause of action or of the amount of damages to which the person is entitled.

No claim of any secured claimant shall be allowed at a sum greater than the difference between the value of the claim without security and the value of the security itself as of the date of the entry of the order of liquidation or any other date the court sets for determining rights and liabilities as provided in W.S.

26-28-123

unless the claimant surrenders his security to the commissioner, in which case the claim shall be allowed in the full amount for which it is valued.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 615; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-615; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-128; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-128.
Order of insolvency; time to file claims after insolvency order; payment of claims; procedure.

If upon the entry of a liquidation order under this chapter or at any time thereafter during liquidation proceedings the insurer is not clearly solvent, the court, upon hearing after notice it deems proper, shall enter an order adjudging the insurer to be insolvent.

After the entry of the order of insolvency, regardless of any prior notice given to creditors, the commissioner shall notify all persons who may have claims against the insurer to file the claims with him, at a place and within the time specified in the notice, or that the claims are forever barred. The time specified in the notice shall be as fixed by the court for filing of claims but not less than six (6) months after the entry of the insolvency order. The notice shall be given in a manner and for a reasonable period of time as the court orders.

Any time after the last day fixed for the filing of proofs of claims in the liquidation of a domestic company, the court, upon the commissioner’s application, may authorize him to declare out of the funds remaining in his hands, one (1) or more dividends upon all claims allowed in accordance with the priorities established in W.S.

26-28-125

.

If there has been no adjudication of insolvency, the commissioner shall pay all allowed claims in full in accordance with the priorities set forth in W.S.

26-28-125

. The commissioner is not chargeable for any assets distributed to any claimant who fails to file a proper proof of claim before the distribution is made.

If after an insolvency adjudication, a surplus is found to exist after the payment in full of all allowed claims falling within the priorities set forth in W.S.

26-28-125

(a)(i) through (iv) and which were filed prior to the last date fixed for the filing thereof, and after the setting aside of a reserve for all additional costs and expenses of the proceeding, the court shall set a new date for the filing of claims. After the expiration of the new date, all allowed claims filed on or before the new date together with all previously allowed claims falling within the priorities set forth in W.S.

26-28-125

(a)(v) and (vi) shall be paid in accordance with the priorities set forth in W.S. 26-28-125.

The commissioner may deposit to his credit any dividends which he holds and remain unclaimed or unpaid for six (6) months after the final distribution order. The dividends shall be held in trust for the person entitled thereto, but that person is not entitled to any interest on the deposit. All such deposits are entitled to priority of payment in case of the depository’s insolvency or voluntary or involuntary liquidation on an equal basis with any other priority given by the banking law. Those funds together with interest, if any, paid or credited thereon, remaining and unclaimed in the commissioner’s hands in trust after two (2) years are presumed abandoned, shall be reported and delivered to the state treasurer and are subject to W.S.

9-5-203

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 616; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-616; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-129; Laws 1979, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-129.
Report and petition for assessment.

Within three (3) years after the date of the entry of a rehabilitation or liquidation order of a domestic mutual insurer or a domestic reciprocal insurer, the commissioner may make and file his report and petition to the court setting forth:

The reasonable value of the insurer’s assets;

The insurer’s liabilities to the extent thus far ascertained by the commissioner;

The aggregate amount of the assessment, if any, which the commissioner deems reasonably necessary to pay all claims, the costs and expenses of collecting the assessments and the costs and expense of the delinquency proceedings in full;

Any other information relative to the insurer’s affairs or property the commissioner deems material.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 617; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-617; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-130; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-28-130.
Order and levy of assessment.

Upon the filing and reading of the report and petition provided for in W.S.

26-28-129

, the court, ex parte, may order the commissioner to assess all the insurer’s members or subscribers who are subject to assessment, in an aggregate amount as the court finds reasonably necessary to pay all valid claims as may be timely filed and proved in the delinquency proceedings, together with the costs and expenses of levying and collecting assessments and the costs and expenses of the delinquency proceedings in full. The order shall require that each member or subscriber be assessed for his proportion of the aggregate assessment, according to a reasonable classification of the members or subscribers and formula as the commissioner determines and the court approves.

The court may order additional assessments upon the filings and reading of any amendment or supplement to the report and petition referred to in subsection (a) of this section, if the amendment or supplement is filed within three (3) years after the date of entry of the rehabilitation or liquidation order.

The commissioner shall levy and assess members or subscribers in accordance with any order entered under this section.

The total of all assessments against any member or subscriber with respect to any policy shall be for no greater amount than that specified in the member’s or subscriber’s policy and as limited under this code [title 26], except as to any policy which was issued at a rate of premium below the minimum rate lawfully permitted for the risk insured, in which case the assessment against any such policyholder shall be upon the basis of the minimum rate for that risk.

No assessment shall be levied against any member or subscriber with respect to any nonassessable policy issued in accordance with this code.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 618; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-618; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-131; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-28-131.
Assessment prima facie correct; notice of amount of assessment; proceedings to enforce payment.

Any assessment of a subscriber or member of an insurer which the commissioner makes pursuant to the court order fixing the aggregate amount of the assessment against all members or subscribers and approving the commissioner’s classification and formula under W.S. 26-28-130(a) is prima facie correct.

Each member or subscriber shall be notified of the amount of his assessment by written notice mailed to the member’s or subscriber’s address last of record with the insurer. Failure of the member or subscriber to receive the notice so mailed, within the time specified therein or at all, is not a defense in any proceeding to collect the assessment.

If any member or subscriber fails to pay the assessment within the period specified in the notice, which period shall not be less than twenty (20) days from the date of mailing the notice, the commissioner may obtain an order in the delinquency proceedings requiring the member or subscriber to show cause at a time and place fixed by the court why judgment should not be entered against the member or subscriber for the amount of the assessment together with all costs. A copy of the order and a copy of the petition therefor shall be served upon the member or subscriber within the time and in the manner designated in the order.

If the subscriber or member after service of a copy of the order and petition referred to in subsection (c) of this section is made upon him:

Fails to appear at the time and place specified in the order, judgment shall be entered against him as prayed for in the petition; or

Appears in the manner and form required by law in response to the order, the court shall hear and determine the matter and enter a judgment in accordance with its decision.

The commissioner may collect any assessment through any other lawful means.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 619; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-619; W.S. 1977, § 26-33-132; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.